Maine, session 132, LD986.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4651, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2017, c. 455, §1, is further
amended to read:
C. A single act or course of conduct constituting a violation of section 4681; Title 17,
section 2931; or Title 17‑A, section 201, 202, 203, 204, 207, 208, 209, 210, 210‑A,
211, 253, 254, 255‑A, 256, 258, 259‑A, 259‑B, 260, 261, 282, 283, 301, 302, 303, 506,
506‑A, 511, 511‑A, 556, 802, 805, 806, 852 or 853.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §321, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A, §32,
is further amended to read:
A. A person is charged with or convicted of a violation of Title 17‑A, section 201,
202, 203, 204, 207, 207‑A, 208, 208‑A, 208‑B, 208‑C, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209,
209‑A, 210, 210‑A, 210‑B, 210‑C, 211, 253, 301, 302, 303, 506‑A or 556;
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §454, as amended by PL 2015, c. 431, §6, is further amended to
read:
§454. Murder or felony murder; filing copies of proceedings; expenses
Whenever any person is convicted of murder or felony murder, by jury verdict, court
finding or court acceptance of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, a copy, as applicable, of
the transcript of the plea hearing, trial testimony and jury instructions, certified by the
Official Court Reporter who created a transcript of the reporter's stenographic notes or the
transcriber who created a transcript from the electronically recorded record, must be filed
with the clerk of the court where that trial is held, and the expense for the transcript must
be paid by the State. A copy, as applicable, of the transcript of the plea hearing, trial
testimony and jury instructions, certified by the Official Court Reporter who created a
transcript of the reporter’s stenographic notes or the transcriber who created a transcript
from the electronically recorded record, must be furnished by the clerk of court to the
Secretary of State at no charge for use in any pardon hearing before the Governor, when
the individual is indigent.
Sec. 4. 15 MRSA §3101, sub-§4, ¶C-2, as amended by PL 2007, c. 475, §6, is
further amended to read:
C-2. With respect to the finding of appropriateness required by paragraph E,
subparagraph (2), the State has the burden of proof, except that in a case involving a
juvenile who is charged with one or more juvenile crimes that, if the juvenile were an
adult, would constitute murder, aggravated attempted murder, attempted murder,
felony murder, Class A manslaughter other than the reckless or criminally negligent
operation of a motor vehicle, elevated aggravated assault on a pregnant person,
elevated aggravated assault, arson that recklessly endangers any person, causing a
catastrophe, Class A robbery or Class A gross sexual assault in which the victim
submits as a result of compulsion, the juvenile has the burden of proof.
Sec. 5. 15 MRSA §3308-C, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 365, §19 and
affected by §37, is amended to read:
A. Any juvenile petition alleging a violation of Title 17‑A, section 201, 202 or 203 if
the juvenile charged had attained 13 years of age at the time of the alleged juvenile
Page 1 - 132LR1693(01)

413 crime, if the Juvenile Court has found there is probable cause to believe the juvenile
424 committed a juvenile crime that would be a violation of Title 17‑A, section 201, 202
435 or 203 if the juvenile involved were an adult.
If the juvenile had not attained 13 years of age at the time of the alleged violation of
Title 17‑A, section 201, 202 or 203, the Juvenile Court may allow public inspection of
the juvenile petition pursuant to paragraph C;
Sec. 6. 17-A MRSA §202, as amended by PL 1991, c. 377, §8, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§1-B, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 715, Pt. B, §1,
is amended by repealing subparagraph (2).
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §4055, sub-§1-A, ¶B, as amended by PL 2015, c. 360, §4, is
further amended by repealing subparagraph (2).